Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5323.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 219a. (1) The department may install 1 or more of the
following on state-owned buildings or critical infrastructure:
(a) Devices that detect unmanned aircraft.
(b) Technology that prevents an unauthorized unmanned aircraft
from flying over the state-owned building or critical
infrastructure.
(2) The department may coordinate with the state
transportation department to ensure that appropriate state-owned
buildings and critical infrastructure are included in any statewide
JJR H03709'25 (H-1) e2mo5w


geofencing database.
(3) This section applies only to the extent that this section
is not preempted by federal law.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "Critical infrastructure" means that term as defined in
section 2 of the cyber civilian corps act, 2017 PA 132, MCL 18.222.
(b) "Unmanned aircraft" means that term as defined in section
3 of the unmanned aircraft systems act, 2016 PA 436, MCL 259.303.
Final Page
JJR H03709'25 (H-1) e2mo5w